Tennessee, session 114, SB0755.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 43-1-604(b), is amended by deleting
"five (5) years" and substituting "six (6) years".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0755
002601
- 1 -